Florida, session 2026, SB1206.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âPresent subsection (2) of section 1012.315, 12 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (4), and a new 13 subsection (2) and subsection (3) are added to that section, to 14 read: 15 1012.315âScreening standards.â 16 (2)âAn applicant seeking employment in a position that 17 requires educator certification, or employment in any position 18 that requires direct contact with students in a district school 19 system, a charter school, or a private school that participates 20 in a state scholarship program under chapter 1002, which 21 includes being an owner or operator of a private school that 22 participates in a scholarship program under chapter 1002, must 23 provide all of the following: 24 (a)âThe name, address, telephone number, and other relevant 25 contact information of the applicantâs: 26 1.âCurrent employer. 27 2.âFormer employers that were school entities. 28 3.âFormer employers for positions in which the applicant 29 had direct contact with children. 30 (b)âA written authorization that consents to and authorizes 31 disclosures pursuant to paragraph (a) to be given to the school 32 district, charter school, or private school at which the 33 applicant seeks employment. 34 (c)âA written statement disclosing whether the applicant: 35 1.âHas been the subject of an abuse or sexual misconduct 36 investigation conducted by any employer, professional licensing 37 agency, law enforcement agency, or child protective services 38 agency, unless the investigation resulted in a finding that the 39 allegations were false. 40 2.âHas ever been disciplined, discharged, nonrenewed, asked 41 to resign from employment, or resigned from or otherwise 42 separated from any employment while allegations of abuse or 43 sexual misconduct as described in subparagraph 1. were pending 44 or under investigation or due to an adjudication or findings of 45 abuse. 46 3.âHas ever had a license, professional license, or 47 certificate suspended, surrendered, or revoked while allegations 48 of abuse or sexual misconduct as described in subparagraph 1. 49 were pending or under investigation or due to an adjudication or 50 findings of abuse or sexual misconduct as described in 51 subparagraph 1. 52 (3)âThe district school system, charter school, or private 53 school at which the applicant seeks employment must conduct a 54 review of the applicant which includes the information provided 55 pursuant to subsection (2). 56 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.